Connecticut, session 2026, SB00426.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than October 1, 2026, the
Department of Administrative Services shall issue a request for
proposals to hire a national consultant with expertise in qualitative
research to conduct an impartial study and make findings as outlined in
subsection (d) of this section. The deadline for responding to the request
for proposals shall be not more than seventy-five days from the date of
issuance of the request for proposals.
(b) The department shall develop criteria for evaluating proposals
relating to conducting such study, including, but not limited to, (1) the
anticipated cost of completing such a study; (2) the anticipated timeline
for completing such a study; and (3) the experience of the entity
responding to the proposal relevant to conducting and completing such
a study.
(c) Not later than February 1, 2027, the department shall evaluate the
proposals submitted under subsection (b) of this section and select an
entity that submitted a proposal to conduct the study.
(d) The selected entity that conducts such study shall (1) examine the:
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 426
(A) Structure of the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection and the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority and determine
if the legislative changes made in public act 11-80 creating the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection accomplished the
General Assembly's intended objectives, as indicated by legislative
history and other records, and whether such legislative changes yielded
benefits for the state, such as progress on the state's energy goals; and
(B) structure of energy policy-making and utility regulation in other
states, including, but not limited to, states that have deregulated
utilities, and (2) make any recommendations for changes to the existing
structure to reflect best practices in other states.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Department of Administrative
Services shall submit the findings of such study and any
recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to energy and
government oversight.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2